Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-813
Lottery game retailer; Tax Commissioner; powers and duties; deposit of funds; liability for tickets.

(1) The Tax Commissioner may require each lottery game retailer to deposit all money received by the lottery game retailer from the sale of lottery tickets, less the amount, if any, retained as compensation for the sale of lottery tickets and less the amount, if any, paid in prizes, in financial institutions designated by the State Treasurer for credit to the State Lottery Operation Trust Fund and to file with the Tax Commissioner or his or her designated agent reports of the lottery game retailer's receipts and transactions regarding the sale of lottery tickets in such form and containing such information as the Tax Commissioner requires.

(2) The Tax Commissioner may make such arrangements for any person, including a financial institution, to perform any functions, activities, or services in connection with the operation of lottery games pursuant to the State Lottery Act and the rules and regulations as he or she deems advisable, and such functions, activities, or services shall constitute lawful functions, activities, and services of such person.

(3) The Tax Commissioner may authorize the electronic transfer of funds from the accounts of lottery game retailers to the State Lottery Operation Trust Fund.

(4) All lottery game retailers shall be fully liable for the face value of all lottery tickets in their possession and shall deliver to the division upon demand all unsold lottery tickets or all money that would have been received by the lottery game retailers had the lottery tickets been sold less the amount, if any, retained as compensation for the sale of lottery tickets and less the amount, if any, paid in prizes.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 34.